North Carolina statutes. Chapter 126. North Carolina Human Resources Act.
Article 15. Communications With Members of the General Assembly.

§ 126-90.
Communications with members of the General Assembly.

A State employee’s right to speak to a member of the General Assembly at the member’s request shall not be directly or indirectly limited by the employee’s supervisor or by any policy of the department, agency, or institution that employs that State employee.

History.

1997-443, s. 22.2(a).

§§ 126-91 through 126-94.

Reserved for future codification purposes.